Washington statutes.
RCW 27.18.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, except where the context otherwise requires:

(1) "Compact" means the interstate library compact.

(2) "Public library agency", with reference to this state, means the state library and any county or city library or any regional library, rural county library district library, island library district library, or intercounty rural library district library.

(3) "State library agency", with reference to this state, means the commissioners of the state library.

[ 1982 c 123 s 17; 1965 ex.s. c 93 s 1.]